Maryland, session 2025, SB0279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(A–1) “ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
7–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(F) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
7–308.
(c) (1) Before a license expires, the licensee periodically may renew it for an
additional 2–year term, if the licensee:
(i) otherwise is entitled to be licensed;
(ii) except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, pays to the
Board a renewal fee of $100; and
(iii) submits to the Board a renewal application on the form that the
Board provides.
(d) A licensee serving on active duty in the [armed forces of the United States]
UNIFORMED SERVICES is exempt from the renewal fee required by this section.
Article – Business Regulation
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 5 –

Ch. 5 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A–1) “ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(J) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(K) “VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
2.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) (1) “ELIGIBLE SPOUSE” MEANS THE SPOUSE OF AN ACTIVE SERVICE
MEMBER OR AN ELIGIBLE VETERAN.
(2) “ELIGIBLE SPOUSE” INCLUDES THE SURVIVING SPOUSE OF:
(I) AN ELIGIBLE VETERAN; OR
(II) AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER WHO DIED BEFORE THE DATE
ON WHICH THE APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE IS SUBMITTED.
(C) “ELIGIBLE VETERAN” MEANS A VETERAN WHO WAS DISCHARGED FROM
ACTIVE DUTY BEFORE THE DATE ON WHICH THE APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE IS
SUBMITTED.
[(b)] (D) (1) “License” means any grant of authority to an individual to
practice an occupation or profession.
(2) “License” includes a certificate, permit, or registration.
[(c) (1) “Military spouse” means the spouse of a service member or veteran.
(2) “Military spouse” includes a surviving spouse of:
(i) a veteran; or
(ii) a service member who died before the date on which the
application for a license is submitted.
(d) “Service member” means an individual who is an active duty member of:
(1) the armed forces of the United States;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(2) a reserve component of the armed forces of the United States; or
(3) the National Guard of any state.]
(e) “Unit” means a unit in the Department that is authorized to issue a license.
[(f) “Veteran” means a former service member who was discharged from active
duty under circumstances other than dishonorable before the date on which the application
for a license is submitted.]
2.5–103.
A unit may allow an individual licensee who is [a] AN ACTIVE SERVICE member [of
an armed force] deployed outside the State to:
(1) renew the license after the expiration of the renewal period without
payment of a penalty or reinstatement fee if the late renewal is a direct result of the
deployment; and
(2) complete any continuing education or continuing competency
requirements for renewal within a reasonable time after renewing the license.
2.5–104.
(a) In calculating an individual’s years of practice in an occupation or a profession,
each unit shall give credit to the individual for all relevant experience as [a] AN ACTIVE
service member.
(b) Each unit shall credit any training and education provided by the [military]
UNIFORMED SERVICES and completed by [a] AN ACTIVE service member toward any
training or education requirements for licensure if the training or education is determined
by the unit to be:
(1) substantially equivalent to the training or education required by the
unit; and
(2) not otherwise contrary to any other licensing requirement.
2.5–105.
(a) (1) Each unit shall issue an expedited license to [a] AN ACTIVE service
member, ELIGIBLE veteran, or [military] ELIGIBLE spouse who meets the requirements
of this section.
– 7 –

Ch. 5 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) If [a] AN ACTIVE service member, ELIGIBLE veteran, or [military]
ELIGIBLE spouse meets the requirements for licensure, a unit shall issue the license within
60 days after receiving a completed application.
(b) An application for a license shall include the following, in the form and
manner required by the unit:
(1) proof that the applicant is [a] AN ACTIVE service member, ELIGIBLE
veteran, or [military] ELIGIBLE spouse;
(2) proof that:
(i) the applicant has held a valid license in good standing issued in
another state for at least 1 year; and
(ii) each valid license held by the applicant issued in another state
is in good standing;
(3) if the applicant is [a] AN ACTIVE service member or ELIGIBLE veteran,
proof that the applicant is assigned to a duty station in the State or has established legal
residence in the State;
(4) if the applicant is a [military] ELIGIBLE spouse, proof that the
applicant’s spouse is assigned to a duty station in the State or has established legal
residence in the State;
2.5–106.
(a) Subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this section, a unit may issue a temporary
license to [a] AN ACTIVE service member, ELIGIBLE veteran, or [military] ELIGIBLE
spouse who has held a valid license in good standing issued in another state for less than 1
year, provided that each valid license held by the ACTIVE service member, ELIGIBLE
veteran, or [military] ELIGIBLE spouse is in good standing.
(b) A temporary license issued under this section authorizes the ACTIVE service
member, ELIGIBLE veteran, or [military] ELIGIBLE spouse, for a limited period of time, as
determined by the unit, to perform services regulated by the unit while the ACTIVE service
member, ELIGIBLE veteran, or [military] ELIGIBLE spouse completes additional
requirements for licensure in this State.
5–803.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
[(4) “Veteran” has the meaning stated in § 9–901 of the State Government
Article.]
[(5)] (4) “Veterans service organization” means an association or other
entity organized for the benefit of veterans that has been recognized by the U.S.
Department of Veterans Affairs or chartered by Congress and any employee or
representative of the association or entity.
12–302.
(a) In addition to any other information required by the Secretary, the records of
a dealer shall include:
(4) for each individual from whom the dealer acquires a precious metal
object:
(ii) identification information about the individual that:
1. positively identifies the individual from at least 2 forms of
identification, which may include an age of majority card, [military] UNIFORMED
SERVICES identification, or passport; and
15–204.
(b) An innkeeper may require each guest at a lodging establishment to register
and may require the guest to produce:
(2) a valid [military] UNIFORMED SERVICES identification card;
19–207.
(a) A person may not falsely impersonate an officer or member of a [military]
UNIFORMED SERVICES or patriotic organization, grand or subordinate lodge, or fraternal
or sororal society that is chartered or has grand or subordinate lodges in the State.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, a person may not wear, or
use to obtain aid, assistance, or personal or social recognition from a person in the State,
the insignia of a [military] UNIFORMED SERVICES or patriotic organization, or a lodge or
fraternal society that is chartered or has grand or subordinate lodges in the State, unless
the person is entitled to use or wear the insignia under the constitution, bylaws, or rules of
the organization, lodge, or society.
[19–501.
In this subtitle, “soldier” means:
– 9 –

Ch. 5 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) an active duty member of the armed forces of the United States,
including the Army, Marine Corps, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Coast Guard, National
Guard, Reserve forces, and any other standard United States military agency; or
(2) a federal active duty member of the State National Guard or Reserve
force.]
[19–502.] 19–501.
This subtitle does not apply to:
(1) the use of [a soldier’s] AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER’S name, portrait,
picture, or image in an attempt to portray, describe, or impersonate that [soldier] ACTIVE
SERVICE MEMBER in a live performance, single and original work of fine art, play, book,
article, film, musical work, radio or television programming, or other audio or audiovisual
work, if the performance, fine art, play, book, article, film, musical work, radio or television
programming, or other audio or audiovisual work does not constitute a commercial
advertisement for any product, good, ware, or merchandise;
(2) the use of [a soldier’s] AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER’S name, portrait,
picture, or image for noncommercial purposes, including any news, public affairs, or sports
broadcast or account;
(3) the use of [a soldier’s] AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER’S name in
truthfully identifying the [soldier] ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER as the author of a particular
work or program or as the performer in a particular performance;
(4) any promotional materials, advertisements, or commercial
announcements for a use described in item (1), (2), or (3) of this section;
(5) unless the exhibition is continued by the professional photographer
after written notice objecting to the exhibition by a person with the authority to grant
consent for use under § 19–503 of this subtitle, the use of photographs, video recordings,
and images by a person practicing professional photography to exhibit, in or about the
professional photographer’s place of business or portfolio, samples of the professional
photographer’s work;
(6) the use of [a soldier’s] AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER’S picture,
portrait, or image that is not facially identifiable; and
(7) a photograph of a monument or a memorial that is placed on any
product, good, ware, or merchandise.
[19–503.] 19–502.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
A person may not knowingly use the name, portrait, picture, or image of [a soldier]
AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER killed in the line of duty within the previous 50 years in
advertising for the sale of a product, good, ware, merchandise, or service, for the purpose of
gaining a commercial advantage, without obtaining prior consent for use from the [soldier]
ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER or the surviving spouse, the personal representative, or the
majority of the heirs of the deceased [soldier] ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER.
[19–504.] 19–503.
A person who violates [§ 19–503] § 19–502 of this subtitle is guilty of a misdemeanor
and on conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $2,500 or imprisonment not exceeding
1 year or both.
Article – Commercial Law
14–1201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(F–1) “ELIGIBLE SERVICE MEMBER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(1) IS AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER, AS DEFINED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE; AND
(2) IS ASSIGNED TO SERVICE AWAY FROM THE USUAL STATION OF
DUTY OF THE INDIVIDUAL.
[(n) “Service member” means an individual in military service who:
(1) (i) Is on active duty as defined in Section 101(d)(1) of Title 10 of the
United States Code; or
(ii) Is a reservist performing duty under a call or order to active duty
under Section 101(a)(13) of Title 10 of the United States Code; and
(2) Is assigned to service away from the usual duty station of the
individual.]
[(o)] (N) “State correctional facility” has the meaning stated in § 1–101 of the
Correctional Services Article.
14–1212.2.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 11 –

Ch. 5 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) “Protected consumer” means an individual who is:
(i) Under the age of 16 years;
(ii) An incapacitated person or a protected person for whom a
guardian or conservator has been appointed in accordance with Title 13 of the Estates and
Trusts Article;
(iii) 85 years old or older;
(iv) [A] AN ELIGIBLE service member; or
(v) An incarcerated person in a State correctional facility.
Article – Economic Development
Subtitle 10. [Military] UNIFORMED SERVICES Personnel and Veteran–Owned Small
Business No–Interest Loan Program.
5–1001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
[(b)] (C) “Fund” means the [Military] UNIFORMED SERVICES Personnel and
Veteran–Owned Small Business No–Interest Loan Fund established under § 5–1006 of this
subtitle.
(D) “RESERVE COMPONENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
[(c)] (E) “Service–disabled veteran” means a veteran with a disability that is
service–connected, as defined in 38 U.S.C. § 101(16).
[(d)] (F) (1) “Small business employer” means an employer who employed an
average of 50 or fewer employees on business days during the calendar year preceding the
determination of eligibility for a loan under this subtitle.
(2) For purposes of paragraph (1) of this subsection, all persons treated as
a single employer under § 414(b), (c), (m), or (o) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be
treated as a single employer under this subtitle.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(G) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(H) “VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
[(e)] (I) “Veteran–owned small business” means a small business that is at least
51% owned by a veteran [as defined in 38 U.S.C. § 101(2)].
5–1002.
(a) Subject to the availability of funds, the Department, in consultation with the
Department of Veterans and Military Families, shall establish a program to provide
no–interest loans under this subtitle to:
(1) small business employers of [military reservists and National Guard
personnel] RESERVE COMPONENT MEMBERS who are called to active duty;
(2) businesses owned by [military reservists and National Guard
personnel] RESERVE COMPONENT MEMBERS who are called to active duty;
(b) If the availability of funds is limited, in making loans under this subtitle, the
Department, in consultation with the Department of Veterans and Military Families, shall
give priority to the businesses described in subsection (a)(2) and (3) of this section.
(c) In making loans under this subtitle, the Department, in consultation with the
Department of Veterans and Military Families, shall take into consideration how to
maximize the number of veterans[, military reservists, and National Guard personnel]
AND RESERVE COMPONENT MEMBERS who would benefit from loans made under this
subtitle.
5–1003.
Loans shall be made under this subtitle for the purposes of:
(1) providing financial support to:
(i) a business owned by a [military reservist or National Guard
member] RESERVE COMPONENT MEMBER who is called to active duty; or
(ii) a small business employer of a [military reservist or National
Guard member] RESERVE COMPONENT MEMBER who is called to active duty;
5–1006.
– 13 –

Ch. 5 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) There is a [Military] UNIFORMED SERVICES Personnel and Veteran–Owned
Small Business No–Interest Loan Fund.
6–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Qualified veteran employee” means an individual who:
(1) is [honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances
from active military, naval, or air service as defined in 38 U.S.C. § 101] A VETERAN, AS
DEFINED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE; and
(2) is a qualified veteran as defined under § 51(d)(3)(A) of the Internal
Revenue Code for purposes of the federal Work Opportunity Tax Credit.
Article – Financial Institutions
1–101.
(a) In this article, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following
words have the meanings indicated.
(Y) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
11–612.2.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
[(2)] (3) (i) [“Military] “ELIGIBLE spouse” means the spouse of [a]
AN ACTIVE service member or ELIGIBLE veteran.
(ii) [“Military] “ELIGIBLE spouse” includes a surviving spouse of:
1. [A] AN ELIGIBLE veteran; or
2. [A] AN ACTIVE service member who died within 1 year
before the date on which the license application, renewal, or change of status is submitted.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(4) (I) “ELIGIBLE VETERAN” MEANS A VETERAN WHO WAS
DISCHARGED FROM ACTIVE DUTY WITHIN 1 YEAR BEFORE THE DATE ON WHICH THE
LICENSE APPLICATION, RENEWAL, OR CHANGE OF STATUS IS SUBMITTED.
(II) “ELIGIBLE VETERAN” DOES NOT INCLUDE A VETERAN WHO
HAS BEEN DISCHARGED FROM ACTIVE DUTY FOR MORE THAN 1 YEAR BEFORE THE
LICENSE APPLICATION, RENEWAL, OR CHANGE OF STATUS IS SUBMITTED.
[(3) “Service member” means an individual who is an active duty member
of:
(i) The armed forces of the United States;
(ii) A reserve component of the armed forces of the United States; or
(iii) The National Guard of any state.
(4) (i) “Veteran” means a former service member who was discharged
from active duty under circumstances other than dishonorable within 1 year before the date
on which the license application, renewal, or change of status is submitted.
(ii) “Veteran” does not include an individual who has completed
active duty and has been discharged for more than 1 year before the license application,
renewal, or change of status is submitted.]
(b) To expedite the renewal or change of status of a license for [a] AN ACTIVE
service member, ELIGIBLE veteran, or [military] ELIGIBLE spouse, the Commissioner
may waive or suspend any licensing requirements to the extent that the waiver or
suspension does not result in the failure to meet the minimum licensing standards set forth
in 12 U.S.C. Chapter 51 and the regulations adopted under it.
(c) To expedite the issuance of a license to [a] AN ACTIVE service member,
ELIGIBLE veteran, or [military] ELIGIBLE spouse who holds a valid mortgage loan
originator license in another state, the Commissioner may waive or suspend any licensing
requirements to the extent that the waiver or suspension does not result in the failure to
meet the minimum licensing standards set forth in 12 U.S.C. Chapter 51 and the
regulations adopted under it.
12–119.
(b) (1) A licensee may not provide check cashing services to a customer unless
the customer presents a form of customarily acceptable identification.
(2) Acceptable forms of identification include:
– 15 –

Ch. 5 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iv) A valid [military] UNIFORMED SERVICES identification card.
Article – General Provisions
1–101.1.
“ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–101.2.
“ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–103.1.
“ARMED FORCES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–114.1.
“RESERVE COMPONENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–114.2.
“SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–116.
“UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–117.
(A) “VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(B) With respect to any State program of benefits, rights, or privileges applicable
to a veteran under this Code, “veteran” includes[, if the individual is eligible under 38
U.S.C. § 101, a member of the commissioned corps of:
(1) the Public Health Service; or
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(2) the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration or its
predecessor, the Coast and Geodetic Survey] AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MEETS THE
DEFINITION OF “VETERAN” UNDER § 9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
Article – Insurance
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(A–1) “ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(RR–1) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–203.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) “Waiver of customer liability” means an optional agreement:
(i) between a utility provider and a customer of the utility provider;
(ii) that is contained in:
1. the agreement under which the utility provider provides
services to the customer; or
2. a separate agreement between the utility provider and the
customer; and
(iii) under which the utility provider agrees, in return for a specified
charge payable by the customer to the utility provider, to waive all or part of the customer’s
liability to the utility provider for incurred charges during a defined period in the event of
any of the following qualifying events or conditions involving the customer:
1. call to active [military] service IN THE UNIFORMED
SERVICES;
8–404.
(a) Except as provided in this section, this subtitle and the other insurance laws
of the State do not apply to:
– 17 –

Ch. 5 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(6) any association, whether or not a fraternal benefit society:
(i) that was organized before 1880;
(ii) the members of which are officers or enlisted, regular or reserve,
active, retired, or honorably discharged members of the [Armed Forces or the Sea Services
of the United States] UNIFORMED SERVICES; and
(iii) a principal purpose of which is to provide insurance and other
benefits to its members and the dependents or beneficiaries of its members.
10–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(o) (1) “Travel insurance” means insurance coverage for personal risk incident
to planned travel, including:
(i) interruption or cancellation of a trip or an event;
(ii) loss of baggage or personal effects;
(iii) damage to accommodations or a rental vehicle;
(iv) sickness, accident, disability, or death occurring during travel, if
issued as incidental to the coverage provided by item (i), (ii), (iii), (v), (vi), or (vii) of this
paragraph;
(v) emergency evacuation;
(vi) repatriation of remains; and
(vii) any other contractual obligations to indemnify or pay a specified
amount to the traveler on determinable contingencies related to travel as the Commissioner
approves.
(2) “Travel insurance” does not include a major medical plan that provides
comprehensive medical protection for a traveler on a trip lasting 6 months or longer, such
as an individual working outside the United States or [military] UNIFORMED SERVICES
personnel being deployed.
10–111.
(a) A person who applies for a license as a resident insurance producer shall:
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(1) in the case of an applicant who is an individual, submit to the
Commissioner a uniform application and declare under penalty of refusal, suspension, or
revocation of the license that the statements made in the uniform application are true,
correct, and complete to the best of the individual’s knowledge and belief;
(2) in the case of an applicant that is a business entity, submit to the
Commissioner a uniform business entity application;
(3) pay the applicable fee required by § 2–112 of this article for a license;
(4) file on the form and in the manner that the Commissioner provides:
(i) any trade name to be used by the applicant;
(ii) the business address of the applicant; and
(iii) the name and residence address of each individual who holds a
license and does business under the trade name; and
(5) submit to the Commissioner any additional information or
documentation that the Commissioner requires, including any information or
documentation to determine the professional competence, good character, and
trustworthiness of the applicant.
(b) [An applicant who has experience in the armed forces of the United States
and qualifies under § 10–104(h)(3) of this subtitle must file an application within 1 year
after the date of discharge from the armed forces.
(c)] (1) This subsection does not apply to a motor vehicle rental company that
applies for a limited lines license to sell insurance in connection with, and incidental to, the
rental of a motor vehicle under Subtitle 6 of this title.
(2) In addition to any other information required on the application, an
applicant that is a business entity must:
(i) identify the licensed insurance producer who is designated to act
as the business entity’s principal contact with the Administration; and
(ii) provide the name and address of each licensed producer
employed by the business entity, each individual who has direct control over its fiscal
management, and each owner, member, or manager of the business entity and each director
of a business entity that is a corporation.
10–116.1.
– 19 –

Ch. 5 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(f) The Commissioner may waive the reinstatement procedures of this section for
an insurance producer who is unable to comply with the renewal and reinstatement
procedures due to:
(1) [military] service IN THE UNIFORMED SERVICES; or
10–408.1.
(b) (1) The fee for a reinstatement under this section shall be:
(i) the amount charged for a full renewal period for the type of
license held by the person seeking the reinstatement; and
(ii) a reinstatement fee of $100.
(2) The Commissioner may limit the reinstatement fee to the amount of the
renewal fee in cases where the reinstatement applicant did not make timely renewal
because of [military] service IN THE UNIFORMED SERVICES, temporary incapacity,
hospitalization, or other hardship.
18–109.
(b) A policy or certificate of long–term care insurance may limit or exclude
coverage of:
(8) illness, treatment, or medical conditions arising out of:
(iii) service in the [armed forces] UNIFORMED SERVICES or
auxiliary units;
20–502.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, this section does
not apply to a person to the extent that the person:
(i) leases a covered vehicle that is a private passenger vehicle to an
individual who does not meet the requirements of subsection (b) of this section; or
(ii) garages the covered vehicle principally outside of the State.
(2) This section applies to a person described in paragraph (1) of this
subsection who is:
(i) a member, on active duty, of the [armed forces of the United
States or the United States Public Health Service] UNIFORMED SERVICES; or
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(ii) a student enrolled in an accredited school, college, or university
or serving a medical internship.
27–501.
(o) (1) With respect to private passenger motor vehicle insurance, an insurer
may not deny, refuse to renew, or cancel coverage or increase rates for applicants or
policyholders who are [military] UNIFORMED SERVICES personnel returning from active
duty overseas solely because they fail to meet underwriting standards that require
continuous coverage unless the failure to maintain continuous coverage existed prior to the
applicant’s or policyholder’s assignment to active duty overseas.
(2) With respect to homeowner’s insurance, an insurer may not deny,
refuse to renew, or cancel coverage or increase rates for applicants or policyholders who are
[military] UNIFORMED SERVICES personnel returning from active duty overseas solely
because they fail to meet:
(i) underwriting standards that require continuous coverage unless
the failure to maintain continuous coverage existed prior to the applicant’s or policyholder’s
assignment to active duty overseas; or
(ii) occupancy requirements if the [military] UNIFORMED
SERVICES personnel can demonstrate that reasonable steps were taken to maintain and
protect the property during the applicant’s or policyholder’s assignment to active duty
overseas.
Article – Labor and Employment
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(A–1) “ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(D–1) “RESERVE COMPONENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(D–2) “SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(F) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
3–708.
– 21 –

Ch. 5 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) An application for renewal of a license, certificate, permit, or other
authorization that an individual is required by law to hold to engage in a profession or trade
is considered timely if the application is submitted within 1 year after the end of the
individual’s active service in the [armed forces of the United States] UNIFORMED
SERVICES.
(b) An individual applying to work in a trade or profession is entitled to credit
toward a period of service as an apprentice in, or in preparation for, the profession or trade
if:
(1) the period is required by law for the profession or trade;
(2) the applicant performed work or received training pertaining to the
profession or trade while in the [armed forces of the United States] UNIFORMED
SERVICES; and
(3) the applicant submits evidence of time and nature of the work or
training satisfactory to the entity that has approval authority under the law.
(c) This section shall be construed liberally.
3–714.
(a) [(1)] In this section [the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Eligible service member” means a full–time active duty member of any
branch of the uniformed services of the United States.]
(3) “Eligible veteran” means, “ELIGIBLE VETERAN” MEANS a veteran of
any branch of the uniformed services of the United States, AS DEFINED IN § 9–901 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, who has received an honorable discharge or a
certificate of satisfactory completion of service, including:
(i) the National Guard;
(ii) the military reserves;
(1) A RESERVE COMPONENT;
(iii) (2) the Commissioned Corps of the Public Health Service; and
(iv) (3) the Commissioned Corps of the National Oceanic and
Atmospheric Administration], “VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(b) An employer may grant a preference in hiring and promotion to:
(1) [an eligible] A veteran;
(2) the spouse of [an eligible] A veteran who has a service–connected
disability;
(3) the spouse of an [eligible] ACTIVE service member; or
(4) the surviving spouse of a deceased [eligible] veteran.
(c) Granting a preference under subsection (b) of this section does not violate any
State or local equal employment opportunity law.
3–803.
(b) An employee may take leave from work on the day that an immediate family
member of the employee is leaving for, or returning from, active duty outside the United
States as a member of the [armed forces of the United States] UNIFORMED SERVICES.
8–906.
(a) An individual who otherwise is unemployed may not be considered to be
employed because the individual is engaged in inactive duty for training as a member of
the National Guard or other reserve component of the [United States armed forces]
UNIFORMED SERVICES.
(b) An individual who otherwise is available for work as required in §
8–903(a)(1)(ii) of this subtitle may not be considered to be unavailable for work because the
individual is engaged in inactive duty for training as a member of the National Guard or
other reserve component of the [United States armed forces] UNIFORMED SERVICES.
(c) Compensation that an individual receives for participation in inactive duty for
training as a member of the National Guard or other reserve component of the [United
States armed forces] UNIFORMED SERVICES may not be deducted from the weekly benefit
amount to which the individual is entitled.
8–1001.
(a) (1) An individual who otherwise is eligible to receive benefits is disqualified
from receiving benefits if the Secretary finds that unemployment results from voluntarily
leaving work without good cause.
(2) A claimant who is otherwise eligible for benefits from the loss of
full–time employment may not be disqualified from the benefits attributable to the
– 23 –

Ch. 5 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
full–time employment because the claimant voluntarily quit a part–time employment, if
the claimant quit the part–time employment before the loss of the full–time employment.
(c) (1) A circumstance for voluntarily leaving work is valid only if it is:
(iii) caused by the individual leaving employment to follow a spouse
if:
1. the spouse:
A. serves in the [United States military] UNIFORMED
SERVICES; or
B. is a civilian employee of the [military] UNIFORMED
SERVICES or of a federal agency involved in [military] UNIFORMED SERVICES operations;
and
2. the spouse’s employer requires a mandatory transfer to a
new location.
8.3–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(A–1) “ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(g) “Deployment” means [a] AN ELIGIBLE service member acting under official
orders who, on any day, is performing service in a training exercise or operation at a
location or under circumstances that make it impossible or infeasible for the ELIGIBLE
service member to spend off–duty time in the housing in which the ELIGIBLE service
member resides when on garrison duty at the ELIGIBLE service member’s permanent duty
station or homeport.
(G–1) “ELIGIBLE SERVICE MEMBER” MEANS AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER OR
FORMER SERVICE MEMBER.
(m) “Qualifying exigency” means any of the following reasons for which leave may
be needed by a family member of [a] AN ELIGIBLE service member:
(1) because the ELIGIBLE service member has received notice of
deployment within 7 days before the deployment is to begin;
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(2) to attend [military] UNIFORMED SERVICES events and related
activities including family support programs related to the active duty of the ELIGIBLE
service member;
(3) to arrange, provide, or attend child care or school activities only when
the ELIGIBLE service member is on active duty call or active duty status;
(4) to make financial and legal arrangements for the ELIGIBLE service
member’s absence or because of the absence;
(5) to attend counseling that:
(i) is needed due to the active duty or call to active duty status of
the ELIGIBLE service member; and
(ii) is provided by an individual who is not a licensed health care
provider;
(6) to spend up to 15 calendar days with [a] AN ELIGIBLE service member
who is on short–term temporary rest and recuperation leave during the period of
deployment;
(7) to attend postdeployment activities including reintegration services for
a period of 90 days immediately following the termination of active status;
(8) to attend to matters related to the death of the ELIGIBLE service
member while on active duty status;
(9) to arrange for or provide alternative care for a parent of the ELIGIBLE
service member when the parent is incapable of self–care and the covered active duty or
call to active duty necessitates a change; or
(10) because of any other issues that arise out of active duty or a call to
active duty that an employer and covered employee agree should be covered.
[(p) “Service member” means an individual who is an active duty or former
member of:
(1) the United States armed forces;
(2) a reserve component of the United States armed forces; or
(3) the National Guard of any state.]
8.3–302.
– 25 –

Ch. 5 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
The purpose of the Program is to provide temporary benefits to a covered individual
who is taking leave from employment:
(4) to care for [a] AN ELIGIBLE service member for whom the covered
individual is next of kin; or
(5) because the covered individual has a qualifying exigency arising out of
the deployment of [a] AN ELIGIBLE service member who is a family member of the covered
individual.
8.3–403.
(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, a covered individual under
§ 8.3–302(2), (3), (4), or (5) of this title shall provide certification for a claim for benefits
under this title.
(2) A certification for a claim for benefits for a covered individual under §
8.3–302(2), (3), or (4) of this title shall include:
(ii) the date on which the serious health condition of the family
member, covered individual, or ELIGIBLE service member commenced;
(vi) 1. for a certification for intermittent leave under § 8.3–302(2)
or (4) of this title, a statement that the covered individual needs to care for a family member
or ELIGIBLE service member and the expected frequency and duration of the intermittent
leave; or
8.3–701.
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, beginning July 1, 2026, a
covered individual taking leave from employment may submit a claim for benefits:
(iv) to care for a service member with a serious health condition
resulting from [military] service IN THE UNIFORMED SERVICES for whom the covered
individual is next of kin; or
(v) to attend to a qualifying exigency arising out of the deployment
of [a] AN ELIGIBLE service member who is a family member of the covered individual.
8.3–702.
(d) (1) A covered individual may not be required to use or exhaust paid
vacation, paid sick leave, or other paid time off under an employer policy before, or while,
receiving benefits under this title.
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
(2) A covered individual and an employer may agree to use paid vacation,
paid sick leave, or other paid time off while a covered individual is receiving benefits
available under this title to replace the covered individual’s wages up to 100% of the covered
individual’s average weekly wage during the period of leave for which benefits are received
under this title.
(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, an employer may
require that benefit payments under this title be made concurrently, or otherwise
coordinated with payments made or leave that is allowed under the terms of a separate
employer–provided leave policy due to parental care, family care, or [military]
UNIFORMED SERVICES leave or under a disability policy.
(4) This subsection may not be construed to reduce any weeks of leave for
which benefits may be paid under this title.
11–503.
(a) In this subtitle the definitions set forth in § 3 of the federal Act shall apply;
definitions set forth below shall have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Dislocated worker” means an individual who:
(6) is the spouse of [a] AN ACTIVE SERVICE member [of the armed forces
on active duty, as defined in 10 U.S.C. § 101(d)(1),] and who has experienced a loss of
employment as a direct result of relocation to accommodate a permanent change in duty
station of the member; or
(7) is the spouse of [a] AN ACTIVE SERVICE member [of the armed forces
on active duty, as defined in 10 U.S.C. § 101(d)(1),] and who has been providing unpaid
services to a family member in the home and is unemployed or underemployed and
experiencing difficulty in obtaining or upgrading employment.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
83. the [Military] UNIFORMED SERVICES Personnel and
Veteran–Owned Small Business No–Interest Loan Fund;
14–601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 27 –

Ch. 5 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) “Veteran” means an individual who is verified [as having served on active duty
in the armed forces of the United States, other than for training, and was discharged or
released under conditions other than dishonorable] TO BE A VETERAN, AS DEFINED IN §
9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
Article – State Government
9–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 37 U.S.C. § 101.
(C) “ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS:
(1) AN ACTIVE DUTY MEMBER OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES; OR
(2) SERVING IN A RESERVE COMPONENT OF THE UNIFORMED
SERVICES ON ACTIVE DUTY ORDERS.
(D) “ARMED FORCES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 10 U.S.C. § 101.
[(b)] (E) “Board” means the Board of Trustees of the Maryland Veterans Trust.
[(c)] (F) “Department” means the Department of Veterans and Military
Families.
(G) “MILITARY FAMILY” INCLUDES THE SPOUSE AND DEPENDENT
CHILDREN OF A SERVICE MEMBER OR VETERAN RELATED BY BLOOD, MARRIAGE, OR
ADOPTION.
(H) “RESERVE COMPONENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 37 U.S.C. § 101.
[(d)] (I) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Veterans and Military Families.
(J) “SERVICE MEMBER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A MEMBER OF:
(1) THE UNIFORMED SERVICES; OR
(2) A RESERVE COMPONENT OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES.
[(e)] (K) “Trust” means the Maryland Veterans Trust.
(L) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 37 U.S.C. § 101.
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 5
[(f)] (M) Except as otherwise provided [in this subtitle], “veteran” [means an
individual who served on active duty in the armed forces of the United States, other than
for training, and was discharged or released under conditions other than dishonorable] HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN 38 U.S.C. § 101.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 29 –